ko: 페인트 유형: 아크릴; 아크릴 프라이머; 에나멜; 프레스코; 유리; 반짝이 포스터; 과슈; 핫 왁스; 잉크; 오일; 파스텔; 포스터; 실크; 스프레이; 템페라; 직물; 텍스처라이징 페이스트; 비닐; 물 혼화성 오일; 물 기반; 수채화; 풍화 분말; 기타
th: ประเภทสี: อะคริลิก; อะคริลิกไพรเมอร์; สีสูตรอีนาเมล; ปูนเปียก; แก้ว; สีโปสเตอร์กลิตเตอร์; สีกวอช; แว๊กซ์ร้อน; หมึก; น้ำมัน; สีพาสเทล; สีโปสเตอร์; ผ้าไหม; สเปรย์; สีฝุ่น; สีระบายผ้า; ดินเปียกสำหรับขึ้นรูป; ไวนิล; สีน้ำมันผสมน้ำ; สูตรน้ำ; สีน้ำ; สีฝุ่นทำคราบ; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de pintura: Acrílico; Imprimación acrílica; Esmalte; Fresco; Vidrio; Póster de purpurina; Témpera; Cera caliente; Tinta; Aceite; Pastel; Póster; Seda; Aerosol; Tempera; Textil; Pasta texturizante; Vinilo; Aceite miscible en agua; A base de agua; Acuarela; Polvo de envejecimiento; Otros
ja: 塗料の種類: アクリル; アクリルプライマー; エナメル; フレスコ; ガラス; グリッターポスター; ガッシュ; ホットワックス; インク; オイル; パステル; ポスター; シルク; スプレー; テンペラ; テキスタイル; テクスチャライジングペースト; ビニール; 水混和性油絵の具; 水性; 水彩; ウェザリングパウダー; その他
ro-RO: Tip de vopsea: Acrilic; Grund acrilic; Email; Fresco; Sticlă; Material decorativ cu sclipici; Guașă; Ceară fierbinte; Cerneală; Ulei; Pastel; Poster; Mătase; Spray; Tempera; Textile; Pastă de texturare; Vinyl; Ulei miscibil cu apă; Pe bază de apă; Acuarelă; Pulbere cu efect de uzură; Altele
fi: Maalityyppi: Akryyli; Akryylipohjamaali; Emali; Fresco; Lasi; Kimalleliimaväri; Guassi; Kuumavaha; Muste; Öljyt; Pastelli; Liimaväri; Silkki; Suihke; Tempera; Tekstiili; Tekstuuria antava tahna; Vinyyli; Veteen sekoittuva öljy; Vesipohjainen; Akvarelliväri; Säänkestävä jauhe; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de tinta para pintura: Acrílico; Primário acrílico; Esmalte; Pintura Fresco; Vidro; Digitinta de purpurina; Guache; Cera quente; Tinta; Óleo; Pastel; Digitinta; Seda; Pulverizador; Têmpera; Têxtil; Pasta para esculpir; Vinil; Óleo miscível em água; À base de água; Aguarela; Pó de efeitos; Outro
fr: Type de peinture: Acrylique; Apprêt acrylique; Vernis; Fresque; Verre; Affiche à paillettes; Gouache; Cire chaude; Encre électronique; Huile; Pastel; Affiche; Soie; Vaporisateur; Détrempe; Textile; Pâte texturante; Vinyl; Huile miscible à l’eau; À base d’eau; Aquarelle; Poudre d’altération; Autre
zh-CN: 颜料类型: 丙烯酸; 丙烯酸底漆; 搪瓷; 壁画; 玻璃; 闪亮海报; 水粉画; 热蜡; 油墨; 润滑油; 彩色; 海报; 丝绸; 喷雾; 蛋彩画; 纺织品; 纹理膏; 乙烯基贴纸; 水混溶性油; 水性; 水彩; 耐候粉; 其他
bg-BG: Тип боя: Акрил; Акрилен грунд; Емайл; Стенопис; Стъкло; Плакат с брокат; Гваш; Горещ восък; Мастило; Масло; Пастел; Плакат; Коприна; Спрей; Темпера; Текстил; Паста за текстуриране; Винил; Смесващо се с вода масло; На водна основа; Акварел; Изветрящ прах; Други
lt-LT: Dažų tipas: Akriliniai; Akrilo gruntas; Emalis; Freska; Stiklas; Plakatas su blizgučiais; Guašas; Karštas vaškas; Rašalas; Aliejiniai; Pastelė; Plakatas; Šilkas; Purškiami; Tempera; Tekstilė; Tekstūruojanti pasta; Viniliniai; Su vandeniu maišomi aliejiniai; Vandens pagrindu; Akvarelė; Sendinantį efektą suteikiantys dažų milteliai; Kita
zh-TW: 顏料類型: 壓克力; 丙烯酸底漆; 琺瑯; 壁畫; 玻璃; 金蔥海報; 水粉畫; 熱蠟; 墨水; 油; 粉彩; 海報; 絲綢; 噴霧; 蛋彩畫; 紡織品; 增稠膏; 乙烯基; 水混溶油; 水性; 水彩; 耐候粉; 其他
sv: Färgtyp: Akryl; Akrylprimer; Emalj; Fresk; Glas; Glitteraffisch; Gouache; Hett vax; Bläck; Olja; Pastell; Affisch; Silke; Spray; Tempera; Textil; Texturerande pasta; Vinyl; Vattenblandbar olja; Vattenbaserad; Vattenfärg; Vittringpulver; Övrigt
nb: Malingstype: Akryl; Akrylprimer; Emalje; Fresco; Glass; Glitterplakat; Gouache; Varm voks; Blekk; Olje; Pastell; Plakat; Silke; Spray; Tempera; Tekstil; Teksturpasta; Vinyl; Vannblandbar olje; Vannbasert; Akvarell; Forvitringspulver; Annet
pl: Typ farby: Akryl; Podkład akrylowy; Emalia; Fresk; Szkło; Brokatowy plakat; Gwasz; Gorący wosk; Tusz; Ropa naftowa; Pastelowy; Plakat; Jedwab; Natrysk; Tempera; Tekstylia; Pasta teksturująca; Winyl; Olej mieszalny z wodą; Na bazie wody; Akwarela; Puder wietrzeniowy; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta boje: Akril; Akrilni temeljni premaz; Emajl; Fresco; Staklo; Svjetlucavi poster; Gvaš; Vrući vosak; Tinta; Ulje; Pastel; Poster; Svila; Sprej; Tempera; Tekstil; Pasta za teksturiranje; Vinil; Ulje koje se miješa s vodom; Na bazi vode; Akvarel; Prašak protiv vremenskih prilika; Ostalo
de: Farbtyp: Acryl; Acrylgrundierung; Emaillelack; Fresco; Glas; Glitzerposter; Gouache; Heißwachs; Tinte; Öl; Pastell; Poster; Seide; Spray; Tempera; Textil; Strukturpaste; Vinyl; Wassermischbare Ölfarbe; Auf Wasserbasis; Aquarellfarbe; Verwitterungspulver; Sonstiges
tr: Boya Tipi: Akrilik; Akrilik astar; Emaye; Fresk; Cam; Parıltılı poster; Guaj boya; Sıcak mum; Mürekkep; Yağ; Pastel; Afiş; İpek; Sprey; Zamklıboya; Tekstil; Doku macunu; Vinil; Suyla karışabilen yağ; Su bazlı; Suluboya; Ayrışma tozu; Diğer
cs: Typ barvy: Akrylové; Akrylový základní nátěr; Email; Freska; Sklo; Třpytivý prášek; Kvaš; Horký vosk; Inkoust; Olej; Pastelový; Plakát; Hedvábí; Sprej; Tempera; Textil; Texturizační pasta; Vinylové; Olej mísitelný s vodou; Na vodní bázi; Akvarelové barvy; Povětrnostní prášek; Jiné
vi: Loại sơn: Acrylic; Sơn lót acrylic; Men; Bích họa; Thủy tinh; Áp phích lấp lánh; Bột màu; Sáp nóng; Mực; Dầu; Phấn màu; Áp phích; Lụa; Dạng xịt; Sơn keo; Vải dệt; Sáp tạo kiểu; Nhựa vinyl; Dầu hòa tan trong nước; Gốc nước; Màu nước; Bột phong hóa; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta barve: Akril; Akrilni temeljni premaz; Emajl; Freska; Steklo; Bleščeči plakat; Gvaš; Vroči vosek; Črnilo; Olje; Pastel; Plakat; Svilnata; Razpršilo; Tempera; Tekstil; Pasta za teksturiranje; Vinil; Olje, ki se meša z vodo; Na vodni osnovi; Akvarel; Prah proti vremenskim vplivom; Drugo
en: Paint type: Acrylic; Acrylic primer; Enamel; Fresco; Glass; Glitter poster; Gouache; Hot wax; Ink; Oil; Pastel; Poster; Silk; Spray; Tempera; Textile; Texturizing paste; Vinyl; Water miscible oil; Water-based; Watercolor; Weathering powder; Other
da: Malingstype: Akryl; Akrylprimer; Emalje; Fresco; Glas; Glitterplakat; Gouache; Varm voks; Blæk; Olie; Pastel; Plakat; Silke; Spray; Tempera; Tekstil; Teksturerende pasta; Vinyl; Vandblandbar olie; Vandbaseret; Akvarel; Forvitringspulver; Andet
hu: Festék típusa: Akril; Akril alapozó; Zománc; Freskó; Üveg; Csillogó poszter; Gouache; Forró viasz; Tinta; Olaj; Pasztell; Poszter; Selyem; Spray; Tempera; Textil; Texturáló paszta; Vinil; Vízzel elegyedő olaj; Vízalapú; Vízfesték; Időjárásálló por; Egyéb
nl: Verftype: Acryl; Acrylprimer; Email; Fresco; Glas; Glitterposter; Gouache; Hete was; Inkt; Olie; Pastel; Poster; Zijde; Spray; Tempera; Textiel; Textuurpasta; Vinyl; Watervermengbare olie; Op waterbasis; Aquarelinkt; Verweringspoeder; Andere
it: Tipo di pittura: Acrilico; Primer acrilico; Smalto; Affresco; Vetro; Tempera glitterata; Guazzo; Cera calda; Inchiostro; Olio; Pastello; Poster; Seta; Spray; Tempera; Tessuto; Pasta texturizzante; Vinile; Olio miscelabile con acqua; A base d'acqua; Acquerello; Polvere scolorente; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de pintura: Acrílico; Primer acrílico; Esmalte; Fresco; Vidro; Pôster brilhante; Guache; Cera quente; Tinta; Óleo; Pastel; Pôster; Seda; Spray; Tempera; Têxtil; Pasta texturizante; Vinil; Óleo miscível em água; À base de água; Tinta de aquarela; Pó de intemperismo; Outro
ru: Тип краски: Акрил; Акриловый грунт; Эмаль; Фреска; Стеклянные; Плакат с блестками; Гуашь; Горячий воск; Чернила; Масло; Пастель; Плакат; Шелк; Спрей; Темпера; Ткань; Текстурирующая паста; Винил; Водорастворимое масло; На водной основе; Акварель; Порошок для защиты от атмосферных воздействий; Другое
el: Τύπος χρώματος: Ακρυλικό; Ακρυλικό αστάρι; Σμάλτο; Τοιχογραφία; Γυαλί; Glitter poster; Γκουάς; Ζεστό κερί; Μελάνι; Έλαιο; Παστέλ; Αφίσα; Μετάξι; Σπρέι; Τέμπερα; Υφασμάτων; Πάστα υφής; Βινύλιο; Αναμίξιμο με νερό λάδι; Με βάση το νερό; Υδροχρωμάτων; Σκόνη για τη φθορά από τις καιρικές συνθήκες; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ farby: Akryl; Akrylový základný náter; Smalt; Freska; Sklo; Trblietavý plagát; Gvaš; Horúci vosk; Atrament; Olej; Pastel; Plagát; Hodváb; Sprej; Tempera; Textilný; Texturizačná pasta; Vinyl; Olej miešateľný s vodou; Na vodnej báze; Akvarel; Pigmentový prášok; Iné